Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1456.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5560.1. Statewide toll-free animal abuse reporting telephone number.(a) Establishment.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall establish a Statewide toll-free animal abuse reporting telephone number for use by a person to report cases of suspected animal abuse or neglect under this subchapter.(b) Reporting process.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall ensure that the Statewide toll-free animal abuse reporting telephone number is available 24 hours a day, seven days a week, for the reporting of cases of suspected animal abuse or neglect. 123456789101112131415161718 The Pennsylvania State Police shall maintain each reported case of suspected animal abuse or neglect to the Statewide toll-free animal abuse reporting telephone number in a database, including contact information for the reporter and the location of the suspected animal abuse or neglect. The Pennsylvania State Police shall refer each report for investigation to the appropriate law enforcement officer or provide a copy of each report to the humane society police officer with jurisdiction. If there is insufficient information provided in a report to establish the location of the suspected animal abuse or neglect, the Pennsylvania State Police shall maintain the report in the database, but the Pennsylvania State Police may not refer the report for investigation under this subsection.(c) Database accessibility.--An appropriate law enforcement officer or a humane society police officer with jurisdiction may access the information in the database under subsection (b) only to investigate a report of a case of suspected animal abuse or neglect. The Pennsylvania State Police shall annually compile information on the number, general location and type of reports to the Statewide toll-free animal abuse reporting telephone number and submit the information to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the Senate and chairperson and minority chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the House of Representatives no later than June 30, 2026, and each year thereafter.(d) Telephone number accessibility.--The Pennsylvania State Police and the Department of Agriculture shall make the Statewide toll-free animal abuse reporting telephone number available on their publicly accessible Internet websites.(e) Assessment.--In addition to any other penalties that may 20250HB1456PN1709 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be imposed for a violation of this subchapter, a person convicted of an offense under this subchapter shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay an additional fine of not less than $25. Fines collected under this subchapter shall be transmitted to the Pennsylvania State Police for maintenance of the Statewide toll-free animal abuse reporting telephone number.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1456PN1709 - 3 - 1234567